Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4421.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1506. In the exercise or performance of his or her powers or duties under this act, an agent of the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy shall not enter private property without a warrant or the consent of the property owner or occupant. The open fields doctrine does not apply to a search conducted by an agent of the department.